Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.625

Notice of order.

The petitioner shall give notice of an order under this article to the individual who is subject to the protective arrangement instead of guardianship or conservatorship, a person whose access to the individual is restricted by the order, and any other person the court determines.

[ 2020 c 312 s 317; 2019 c 437 s 510.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.